Illinois, session 104th, SB4096.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named sums, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and purposes 7hereinafter named, are appropriated from the General Revenue 8Fund to meet the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 9following divisions of the Department of Juvenile Justice for 10the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027:11GENERAL OFFICE12  For Personal Services.............................7,203,60013  For State Contributions to14   Social Security....................................551,10015  For Contractual Services..........................3,004,40016  For Travel...........................................80,00017  For Commodities......................................55,50018  For Printing.........................................10,00019  For Equipment.....................................1,207,00020  For Electronic Data Processing....................2,185,30021  For Telecommunication Services......................607,20022  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................28,80023  For Refunds.............................................600  SB4096- 2 -OMB104 00179 HAR 10179 b1  For Tort Claims.....................................180,0002    Total                                         $15,113,5003SCHOOL DISTRICT4  For Personal Services.............................8,240,0005  For State Contributions to Teachers'6   Retirement System........................................07  For State Contributions to 8   Social Security ...................................630,4009  For Contractual Services............................710,30010  For Travel............................................5,20011  For Commodities......................................20,70012  For Printing..........................................1,20013  For Equipment.........................................5,30014  For Telecommunication Services.......................36,60015  For Operation of Auto Equipment...........................016  For Expenses Associated with High School17   Education Services for Incarcerated18   Individuals Per 105 ILCS 5/13-40.................4,300,00019    Total                                         $13,949,70020COMMUNITY SERVICES DIVISION21  For Personal Services............................10,455,30022  For State Contributions to23   Social Security....................................799,90024  For Contractual Services.........................12,904,80025  For Travel...........................................19,50026  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,  SB4096- 3 -OMB104 00179 HAR 10179 b1   Paroled, and Discharged Youth........................5,0002  For Commodities.......................................5,5003  For Printing..........................................6,5004  For Equipment........................................10,0005  For Telecommunication Services......................209,2006  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................110,7007    Total                                         $24,526,400 8    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 9thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 10the Department of Juvenile Justice from the General Revenue 11Fund:12ILLINOIS YOUTH CENTER - CHICAGO13  For Personal Services............................14,493,90014  For Student, Member, and15   Inmate Compensation.................................59,50016  For State Contributions to17   Social Security..................................1,108,80018  For Contractual Services..........................4,864,90019  For Travel............................................7,50020  For Commodities.....................................604,90021  For Printing..........................................5,50022  For Equipment........................................40,00023  For Telecommunication Services......................132,70024  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................12,60025    Total                                         $21,330,300  SB4096- 4 -OMB104 00179 HAR 10179 b1ILLINOIS YOUTH CENTER - HARRISBURG2  For Personal Services............................20,920,7003  For Student, Member, and4   Inmate Compensation.................................48,0005  For State Contributions to6   Social Security..................................1,600,5007  For Contractual Services..........................4,220,7008  For Travel...........................................40,0009  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,10   Paroled, and Discharged Youth............................011  For Commodities.....................................429,90012  For Printing..........................................7,40013  For Equipment........................................60,00014  For Telecommunication Services......................123,10015  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................30,50016    Total                                         $27,480,80017ILLINOIS YOUTH CENTER - LINCOLN18  For Equipment.............................................019  For Operational Expenses for IYC Lincoln.........15,000,00020    Total                                         $15,000,00021ILLINOIS YOUTH CENTER - PERE MARQUETTE22  For Personal Services.............................8,832,60023  For Student, Member, and 24   Inmate Compensation.................................45,00025  For State Contributions to26   Social Security....................................675,700  SB4096- 5 -OMB104 00179 HAR 10179 b1  For Contractual Services..........................1,543,8002  For Travel............................................8,5003  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,4   Paroled, and Discharged Youth............................05  For Commodities.....................................298,2006  For Printing..........................................5,4007  For Equipment........................................30,0008  For Telecommunication Services......................105,5009  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................14,40010    Total                                         $11,559,10011ILLINOIS YOUTH CENTER - ST. CHARLES12  For Personal Services............................16,347,70013  For Student, Member, and 14   Inmate Compensation.................................98,50015  For State Contributions to16   Social Security..................................1,250,60017  For Contractual Services..........................7,531,80018  For Travel............................................7,50019  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,20   Paroled, and Discharged Youth............................021  For Commodities.....................................612,90022  For Printing.........................................13,00023  For Equipment........................................60,00024  For Telecommunication Services......................203,30025  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................71,40026    Total                                         $26,196,700  SB4096- 6 -OMB104 00179 HAR 10179 b1ILLINOIS YOUTH CENTER - WARRENVILLE2  For Personal Services............................12,739,7003  For Student, Member, and 4   Inmate Compensation.................................35,3005  For State Contributions to6   Social Security....................................974,6007  For Contractual Services..........................3,470,4008  For Travel............................................6,0009  For Commodities.....................................474,90010  For Printing..........................................9,00011  For Equipment........................................50,00012  For Telecommunication Services......................123,60013  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................13,80014    Total                                         $17,897,300 15STATEWIDE SERVICES AND GRANTS 16    Section 15. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 18Department of Juvenile Justice for the objects and purposes 19hereinafter named:20Payable from the General Revenue Fund:21  For Repairs, Maintenance and Other Capital22   Improvements, including prior years' costs.........100,00023  For Sheriffs' Fees for Conveying Juveniles............2,60024    Total                                            $102,600   SB4096- 7 -OMB104 00179 HAR 10179 b1    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 2thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Department of Juvenile Justice for the objects and purposes 4hereinafter named:5Payable from the Department of Corrections 6 Reimbursement and Education Fund:7  For payment of expenses associated8   with School District Programs....................2,500,0009  For payment of expenses associated with10   federal programs, including, but not11   limited to, construction of additional12   beds, treatment programs, and13   juvenile supervision.............................1,500,00014  For payment of expenses associated with15   miscellaneous programs, including, but not16   limited to, medical costs, food expenditures,17   and various construction costs...................2,500,00018Payable from the Department of Juvenile Justice 19 Reimbursement and Education Fund:20  For payment of expenses associated21   with School District Programs....................2,500,00022  For payment of expenses associated with federal23   programs, including, but not limited to,24   construction of additional beds treatment25   programs, and juvenile supervision...............1,500,00026  For payment of expenses associated with  SB4096- 8 -OMB104 00179 HAR 10179 b1   miscellaneous programs, including, but not2   limited to, medical costs, food expenditures,3   and various construction costs...................2,500,0004    Total                                         $13,000,000 5    Section 25. The amounts appropriated for repairs and 6maintenance, and other capital improvements in Section 15 for 7repairs and maintenance, roof repairs and/or replacements, and 8miscellaneous capital improvements at the Department's various 9institutions are to include construction, reconstruction, 10improvements, repairs and installation of capital facilities, 11costs of planning, supplies, materials, and all other expenses 12required for roof and other types of repairs and maintenance, 13capital improvements, and purchase of land. 14    Section 30. The sum of $8,000, or so much thereof as may be 15necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Juvenile 16Justice from the General Revenue Fund for costs and expenses 17associated with payment of statewide hospitalization. 18    Section 35. The amount of $1,658,700, or so much thereof 19as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 20Fund to the Department of Juvenile Justice for the purposes of 21investigating complaints, evaluating policies and procedures, 22and securing the rights of the youth committed to the 23Department of Juvenile Justice, including youth released to   SB4096- 9 -OMB104 00179 HAR 10179 b1the Community Services Division before final discharge. 2    Section 40. The amount of $83,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 4Fund to the Department of Juvenile Justice for costs 5associated with positive behavior interventions and supports. 6    Section 45. The amount of $2,500,000, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Facility 8Repair and Maintenance Fund to the Department of Juvenile 9Justice for repairs, maintenance, and other permanent 10improvements, including prior years' cost. 11    Section 50. No contract shall be entered into or 12obligation incurred or any expenditure made from any 13appropriation herein made in Section 45 of this Article until 14after the purpose and amounts have been approved in writing by 15the Governor. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 172026.